West Virginia, session 2025, SB808.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE. 2. DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES. §15A-2-4a.  West Virginia Justice Reinvestment Task Force. (a) (1) The Director of the Division of Administrative Services shall provide administrative support to the West Virginia Justice Reinvestment Task Force established by this section. (2) The director shall coordinate with the Council of State Governments Justice Center to provide state leaders with technical assistance with the goals of increasing public safety and controlling corrections costs, resulting in a more cost-effective justice system. (b) The purpose of this task force is to undertake a comprehensive analysis of West Virginia’s adult justice system and develop recommendations that may include, but not be limited to, bail and pretrial services, sentencing and release policy, supervision practices, correctional programing, behavioral health and reentry supports, and services for the victims of crime.(c) The Task Force shall consist of the following 19 members:(1) The Governor or his or her designee;(2) The Administrative Director of the Supreme Court of Appeals or his or her designee;(3) The Director of the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation or his or her designee;(4) The Director of the Division of Administrative Services or his or her designee;(5) The Chairperson of the West Virginia Parole Board or his or her designee;(6) The Commissioner of the Bureau for Behavioral Health of the Department of Human Services or his or her designee;(7) Two members of the West Virginia Legislature, one appointed by the by the President of the Senate and one by the Speaker of the House, respectively;(8) One circuit court judge and one magistrate appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Appeals;(9) Nine members of the public who shall serve at the will and pleasure of the Governor and shall be appointed by the Governor as follows:(A) A representative of victims of crime who may be a personal victim of crime;(B) A prosecuting attorney;(C) A licensed attorney of this state who primarily practices criminal defense;(D) A representative of law enforcement;(E) A county sheriff;(F) A person who has previously been incarcerated in West Virginia;(G) A representative of the West Virginia Association of Counties;(H) A representative of a substance use disorder treatment program; and (I) A representative of community mental health programs.(d) The Governor shall designate the chair of the Task Force.(e) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made upon the effective date of this section. Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority, as applicable, within 90 days of the vacancy occurring.(f) The Task Force shall hold its first meeting not later than 30 days after the effective date of this section and shall meet at least quarterly thereafter with options to either attend in-person or online.(g) The Task Force shall submit an electronic progress report by July 1, 2025, to the Governor and the Legislature covering the Task Force's findings and a final report and recommendations by January 15, 2026.(h) The Task Force shall terminate one year from the date that it submits the final report.